Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 61 O.S. 2021, Section 83, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 83. A public agency awarding any contract for the
construction, repair, remodeling, or demolition of a public
improvement or obligating funds pursuant to such a contract, shall
ensure that neither the awarding public agency nor any construction
manager acting on behalf of the public agency shall, in its bid
specifications, project agreements, or other controlling documents,
include:
1. A term that requires, prohibits, encourages, or discourages
bidders, contractors, or subcontractors from entering into or
adhering to agreements with a collective bargaining organization

ENGR. H. B. NO. 2168 Page 1

rela ting to the construction project or other related construction
projects; and
2. A a term that discriminates against bidders, contractors, or
subcontractors based on the status as a party or nonparty to, or the
willingness or refusal to enter into, an agreement with a collective
bargaining organization relating to the construction project or
other related construction projects.
Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of__________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate









ENGR. H. B. NO. 2168 Page 2